lexicon.lexc
LEXICON Root

Noun ;

LEXICON Noun

ağaç		N;
amaç		N;	
bacak		N;
bıçak		N;
bayrak		N;
bilek		N;
cevap		N;
çocuk		N;
dolap		N;
geçit		N;
inat		N;
kaçak		N;
kağıt   	N;
kilit		N;
kitap		N;
kulak		N;
küskünlük	N;
senet		N;
tüfek		N;
yanak		N;

bayram 		N;	
bilgisayar	N;
cam			N;
cüzdan		N;
ekran		N;
defter		N;
duvar		N;
gündüz		N;
insan		N;
mevsim		N;
kan 		N;
kalem		N;
kas			N;
komidin		N;
kürdan		N;
sabah		N;
telefon		N;
tutar		N;
volkan		N;
yazılım		N;

LEXICON N

+acc:^	#;
